District of Columbia statutes.
47-1004

National Society of the Colonial Dames of America.

The property in the District of Columbia described as lot no. 801, in square no. 1285, together with the improvements thereon, known as premises no. 2715 Q Street Northwest, and the furnishings therein, owned by the National Society of the Colonial Dames of America, a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the District of Columbia, shall be exempt from taxation, national and municipal, so long as the same is used for nonprofit purposes. There shall also be exempt from taxation upon the same terms and conditions the adjoining property owned by the National Society of the Colonial Dames of America, now designated on the records of the Assessor of the District of Columbia as Lots 813 and 814 in Square 1285, together with any improvements which may hereafter be erected thereon by said National Society of the Colonial Dames of America.

Sept. 7, 1949, 63 Stat. 694, ch. 564
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 90-459, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1004.
1973 Ed., § 47-801a-2.

Prior Codifications

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.

Editor's Notes